District of Columbia statutes.
2-1707

Confidentiality safeguarded.

(a)

Any public record made confidential by law shall be so treated.

(b)

No provision of this chapter shall be construed to authorize or require the opening of any records ordered to be sealed by a court.

Sept. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-19, § 8, 32 DCR 3590
1981 Ed., § 1-2907.